California, session 20252026, AB2432.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 39601.3 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:39601.3. When the state board revises, adopts, or establishes any policy, standard, rule, or regulation pursuant to Section 39601 that would have a direct financial impact on drivers in the state, the state board it shall consider the financial burden on drivers and shall prepare a thorough analysis and evaluation of the financial impact, including, but not limited to, any increase to the retail price of gasoline or other motor vehicle fuel, of the proposed action on drivers to ensure full transparency.